en: Chocolate-covered figs
de: Schokoladenüberzogene Feigen
es: Higos cubiertos de chocolate
fi: Suklaakuorrutetut viikunat
fr: Figues enrobées de chocolat
hr: Smokve prelivene čokoladom
it: Fichi ricoperti di cioccolato
lt: Figos šokolade
nl: Chocolade bedekte vijgen
pt: Figos cobertos de chocolate

en: Chocolate-covered prune
de: Pflaumen mit Schokoladenüberzug
es: Ciruela cubierta de chocolate
fr: Pruneau recouvert de chocolat, Pruneau au chocolat
hr: Suhe šljive prelivene čokoladom
it: Prugna ricoperta di cioccolato
lt: Šokoladu aptraukti slyvos
nl: Chocolade bedekte pruim

en: Chocolate-covered raisins
da: Rosiner med chokoladeovertræk
de: Schokoladenrosinen
es: Pasas recubiertas de chocolate
fi: Suklaarusinat
fr: Raisins secs enrobés de chocolat, Raisins secs au chocolat
hr: Grožđice prelivene čokoladom
lt: Razinos šokolade
nl: Chocoladerozijnen
sv: Chokladöverdragna russin, Russin med chokladöverdrag

en: Chocolate covered cranberries
fr: Canneberges enrobées de chocolat, Canneberges au chocolat
hr: Brusnice prelivene čokoladom
lt: Spanguolės šokolade

en: Chocolate covered cherries
de: Kirschen mit Schokoladenüberzug
es: Cerezas recubiertas de chocolate
fr: Cerises enrobées au chocolat
hr: Višnje prelivene čokoladom
it: Ciliegie ricoperte di cioccolato
lt: Vyšnios šokolade
nl: Kersen met een chocolaag

en: Chocolate covered raspberries
fr: Framboises enrobées de chocolat

en: Chocolate covered strawberries
fr: Fraises enrobées de chocolat

en: Chocolate covered nuts and fruits mixes
nl: Gemengde noten en fruit bedekt met chocolade

en: Chocolate covered nuts, Chocolate confectionery filled with nuts
de: Mit Schokolade überzogene Nüsse
es: Frutos de cáscara recubiertos de chocolate, Frutos secos recubiertos de chocolate
fi: Suklaapähkinät
fr: Fruits à coques enrobés de chocolat, fruits à coque au chocolat, Bouchées au chocolat fourrées aux fruits à coques
hr: Orasi preliveni čokoladom
it: Frutta secca ricoperta di cioccolato
lt: Riešutai šokolade, Šokoladiniai saldainiai su riešutais
nl: Noten in chocolade
pt: Frutos secos cobertos com chocolate

en: Chocolate covered Brazil nuts
nl: Paranoten in chocolade

en: Chocolate covered almonds, Chocolate coated almonds
de: Mandeln mit Schokoladenüberzug, Schokolierte Mandeln
es: Almendras recubiertas de chocolate
fr: Amandes enrobées de chocolat, Amandes chocolatées
hr: Bademi preliveni čokoladom
it: Mandorle al cioccolato
lt: Migdolai šokolade
nl: Amandelen in chocolade
pt: Amêndoas cobertas com chocolate

en: Chocolate covered cashews
fr: Noix de cajou enrobées de chocolat

en: Chocolate covered hazelnuts, Chocolate-coated hazelnuts
fr: Noisettes enrobées de chocolat
hr: Lješnjaci preliveni čokoladom
lt: Lazdyno riešutai šokolade

en: Chocolate covered peanuts, Chocolate coated peanuts, Sugar and chocolate coated peanuts
de: Erdnüsse mit Schokoladenüberzug
es: Cacahuetes recubiertos de chocolate, Maní recubierto de chocolate
fi: Suklaalla päällystetyt maapähkinät
fr: Cacahuètes au chocolat, cacahuètes enrobées de chocolat, cacahuètes enrobées de chocolat type M&M's, Cacahuètes enrobées de chocolat dragéifiées
hr: Kikiriki preliven čokoladom
hu: Csokoládéval bevont mogyoró
it: Arachidi ricoperte di cioccolato, Noccioline ricoperte di cioccolato
lt: Žemės riešutai šokolade
nl: Chocopindas, Pindarotsjes
pt: Amendoins cobertos com chocolate

en: Chocolate covered walnuts
fr: Noix enrobées de chocolat

en: Chocolate covered coffee beans, Chocolate coated coffee beans
fr: Grains de café enrobés de chocolat

en: Candies, candy, sweets
bg: Бонбони, Бонбон
ca: Caramels
da: Slik
de: Bonbons, Bonbon
es: Golosinas, chuchería, chuche, galguería, guarrería
fi: karkit
fr: Bonbons, Bonbon
he: ממתקים
hr: bomboni, bombon
hu: Cukorkák, édességek
it: Caramelle
ja: キャンディ, キャンディー, キャンデー
lt: Saldainiai
nl: Snoep
pl: Cukierki, słodycze, cukierek, słodkości
pt: Rebuçados e gomas
ru: Сладости
sv: Godis, Sötsaker
th: ลูกอม
zh: 糖果

en: Sugarfree candies
bg: Бонбони без захар
de: Bonbons (zuckerfrei), zuckerfreier Bonbons
es: Golosinas sin azúcar
fi: sokeriton karkit
fr: Bonbons sans sucre, Bonbons sans sucres
nl: Snoep (suikervrij)

en: French candies
fr: Bonbons français
hr: Francuski bomboni
lt: Prancūziški saldainiai

en: Liquorice candies, Licorice candies
fr: Bonbons au réglisse, Bonbons à la réglisse
hr: Slatkiši od sladića
lt: Saldymedžio saldainiai
nl: Drop